Hawaii statutes.
[§571-94] Hearings; electronic
participation. Upon reasonable advance notice to the court and the other
parent and for good cause shown, the court may expedite custody hearings
involving deploying parents and may allow an already-deployed parent to participate
in a custody hearing by electronic means, including telephone, video
conference, and any other means available to and deemed reliable by the court.
[L 2010, c 177, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next